Hawaii statutes.
§150-27 Duties and authority of the
department. (a) The department may, through its authorized agents and
inspectors:

(1) Enter any premises during regular business hours
in order to have access to seed and records related to seed subject to this
chapter.

(2) Cooperate with the United States Department of
Agriculture and other agencies or associations in seed law enforcement.

(3) Enforce a stop-sale order issued to the vendor
for any agricultural or vegetable seed in violation of this chapter.

(b) It is the duty of the department to:

(1) Inspect, sample, make analysis of, and test seed
to determine whether the seed is in compliance with this chapter.

(2) Inspect records to determine whether the seed is
in compliance with this chapter.

(3) Forward to the appropriate party, a report of the
analysis and test result, and a stop-sale order if necessary, upon completion
of the analysis and test of the seed.

(4) Provide on request, seed testing and analyzing
service to any person. [L 1945, c 90, pt of §2; RL 1955, §26-11; am L Sp 1959
2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; HRS §150-27; am L 1987, c 164, §9; am L
1991, c 73, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next